Utah statutes.
78A-2-601.   Security surcharge -- Application and exemptions -- Deposit in restricted account.

(1)  In addition to any fine, penalty, forfeiture, or other surcharge, a security surcharge of $33 shall be assessed in all courts of record on all criminal convictions and juvenile delinquency judgments.

(2)  The security surcharge may not be imposed upon:

(a)  nonmoving traffic violations;

(b)  community service; and

(c)  penalties assessed by the juvenile court as part of the nonjudicial adjustment of a case under Section 78A-6-602.

(3)  The security surcharge shall be collected after the surcharge under Section 51-9-401, but before any fine, and deposited with the state treasurer.  A fine that would otherwise have been charged may not be reduced due to the imposition of the security surcharge.

(4)  The state treasurer shall deposit the collected security surcharge in the restricted account, Court Security Account, as provided in Section 78A-2-602.

